dicts/ak_GH/ak_GH.aff
SET UTF-8 
TRY eɛsianrtolcɔdugmphbyfvkwzEƐSIANRTOLCƆDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'
LANG ak


PFX B Y 2				
PFX B 	0	m	[bfpm]		
PFX B 	0	n	[^aeɛioɔu]	

PFX C Y 2				
PFX C 	me	wo	.	
PFX C	wo	me	.	

SFX D Y 2			
SFX D	0	wa	[aeɛioɔu]	
SFX D	0	ba	[aeɛioɔu]

SFX E Y	1				
SFX E	0	ni	[aeɛioɔu]	

SFX F Y	1					
SFX F	0	fo	[aeɛioɔu]	

REP 16
REP a e			
REP e a			
REP ts t		
REP t ts
REP yin n
REP n yin
REP s d
REP d s
REP ɛ ɛw
REP ɛw ɛ
REP m mu
REP mu m
REP dz d
REP d dz
REP dz s
REP s ds
